District of Columbia statutes.
38-1802.15

Federal entities.

(a)

In general. —

The following federal agencies and federally established entities are encouraged to explore whether it is feasible for the agency or entity to establish one or more public charter schools:

(1)

The Library of Congress;

(2)

The National Aeronautics and Space Administration;

(3)

The Drug Enforcement Administration;

(4)

The National Science Foundation;

(5)

The Department of Justice;

(6)

The Department of Defense;

(7)

The Department of Education; and

(8)

The Smithsonian Institution, including the National Zoological Park, the National Museum of American History, the John F. Kennedy Center for the Performing Arts, and the National Gallery of Art.

(b)

Report. —

Not later than 120 days after April 26, 1996, any agency or institution described in subsection (a) of this section that has explored the feasibility of establishing a public charter school shall report its determination on the feasibility to the appropriate congressional committees.

Apr. 26, 1996, 110 Stat. 1321 [253], Pub. L. 104-134, § 2215
1981 Ed., § 31-2853.25.